src/morphology/incoming/dgr-phon.xfscript
define hl2lRule [ l -> ł || h _ ] ;

! D-effect rules
define d2jRule [ ᴰ [ z | s ] h -> j ] ;
define d2dzRule [ ᴰ [ z | s ] -> d z ] ;
define d2dlRule [ ᴰ -> d || _ l ] ;
define d2gwRule [ ᴰ w -> g w ] ;
define d2gRule [ ᴰ g h -> g ] ;
define d2tejecRule [ ᴰ ʔ -> t ' ] ;
define dDeleteRule [ ᴰ -> 0 ] ;
define morphBoundRemoveRule [ %< -> 0 ] ;
read regex [

	d2jRule 		.o.
	d2dzRule		.o.
	d2dlRule		.o.
	d2gwRule		.o.
	d2gRule			.o.
	d2tejecRule		.o.
	dDeleteRule 	.o.
	hl2lRule        .o.
	morphBoundRemoveRule		

] ;
